Louisiana, session 2026, SB343.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4570.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4570.1. Board of commissioners; officers; quorum; employees
A. The commission shall be composed of five three ex officio members and
four six appointed members for a total of nine commissioners. The ex officio
members shall be the mayors of the following municipalities: Baker, Baton Rouge,
Central, St. George, and Zachary. Each mayor may designate a person to serve in his
place as a member of the commission. Each designee shall serve at the pleasure of
the designating mayor. The ex officio members shall serve during their terms of
office. mayor-president, or an officer or employee of the city or parish
designated by the mayor-president from time to time; a member of the school
board of East Baton Rouge Parish, designated by the school board for a term
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-603 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 343
coincident with his term on the school board; and a member of the planning
commission designated by the planning commission for a term coincident with
his term on the planning commission. The four six appointed members shall be
qualified voters of the parish appointed by the governing authority of the city of
Baton Rouge, parish of East Baton Rouge metropolitan council for terms of three
years. Of the four appointed members, at least two shall be residents of the city of
Baton Rouge, and at least one shall be a resident of the unincorporated area of East
Baton Rouge Parish. Following the release of each federal decennial census, the
commission may, by majority vote, reallocate these designated residency
requirements to reflect the changes in population distribution across the parish. Any
such reallocation shall apply prospectively and shall not alter the term of any sitting
member. Vacancies shall be filled by the designating or appointing authority body
for the unexpired portion of the term. All commission members shall serve
without compensation.
B. The commission shall elect from its the six appointed members a
chairman, a vice chairman, and a treasurer whose terms of office shall be one year.
Five Four members shall constitute a quorum of the commission for all purposes.
The commission shall have the power and authority to name and employ a person
who shall be designated as superintendent of the commission, who shall not be a
member of the commission, and who shall be ex officio secretary of the commission,
and to prescribe and pay an annual salary to the superintendent.
Section 2. The Plan of Government of the Parish of East Baton Rouge and the city
of Baton Rouge is mandated by its Home Rule Charter. In its Charter, Section 11.02, titled
"Recreation and Park Commission", it states in part "The Recreation and Park Commission
for East Baton Rouge Parish shall consist of: the mayor-president, or an officer or employee
of the city parish designated by the mayor-president from time to time; a member of the
school board of East Baton Rouge Parish appointed by the school board for a term
coincident with his term on the school board; a member of the planning commission
appointed by the latter for a term coincident with his term on the planning commission; and
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-603 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 343
six qualified voters of the parish appointed by the Metropolitan Council for terms of three
years. The six members of the commission appointed by the council in office on January 1,
1953, shall each continue to hold office until the expiration of the term for which he was
appointed, thereafter his successor shall be appointed for a term of three years. Vacancies
among the appointive members shall be filled by the appointing body of the unexpired
portion of the term...".
Section 3. Act No. 391 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature enacted
changes to the membership of the Recreation and Park Commission for East Baton Rouge
Parish in contradiction to the structure and organization of the plan of government of the
parish of East Baton Rouge and the city of Baton Rouge; thus failing to adhere to Article VI,
Section 5(E) and Section 6 of the Constitution of Louisiana in which Section 6 particularly
states, "[t]he legislature shall enact no law the effect of which changes or affects the
structure and organization or the particular distribution and redistribution of the powers and
functions of any local governmental subdivision which operates under a home rule charter,".
Section 4. The terms of the members of the Recreation and Park Commission for the
parish of East Baton Rouge in office on the effective date of this Act shall terminate on that
date; however, the members shall remain in office until the commission members take office
as provided in this Act. The members of the Recreation and Park Commission for the parish
of East Baton Rouge shall take office as provided in this Act and shall serve terms of office
as provided in this Act.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-603 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 343